test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-jueqlgg_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - jueʹlǧǧ e-stem: # Noun 'foot; leg/jalka' - full paradigm
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Nom: jueʹlǧǧ
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Gen: jueʹlj
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Acc: jueʹlj
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Ill: juâlgga
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Loc: jueʹljest
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Com: [juõʹljin, jueʹljin]
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Ess: jueʹlǧǧen
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Par: jueʹlǧǧed
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Abe: [jueʹljtaa, jueʹljtää]
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Nom: jueʹlj
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Gen: [juõʹlji, jueʹlji]
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Acc: [juõʹljid, jueʹljid]
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Ill: [juõʹljid, jueʹljid]
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Loc: [juõʹljin, jueʹljin]
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Com: [juõʹljivuiʹm, jueʹljivuiʹm]
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Abe: [juõʹljitaa, juõʹljitää, jueʹljitaa, jueʹljitää]
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/teʹm+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom: jueʹljteʹm
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/teʹm+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom: jueʹljteeʹm
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/teʹm+A+Attr: jueʹljteʹmes
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/t+A+Comp: jueʹljtab
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/t+A+Der/umus+Superl: jueʹljtumus
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juâlǥaž
